Hawaii statutes.
[§668A-6] Special master. The court
shall appoint a special master to fulfill the notice requirements pursuant to
this chapter or that are not specifically assigned to any cotenant by this
chapter. The costs of the services of the special master and the expenses of
the notices shall be paid by the cotenants at the conclusion of the partition
action; provided that the court may in its discretion order the payment of
costs and expenses from the estate of the deceased, the proceeds of the
partition by sale, the cotenants, or a combination thereof. [L 2016, c 260, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next